engine/dictionaries/sr/sr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1410 Y 27
SFX 1410 ати ати
SFX 1410 ати им
SFX 1410 ати иш
SFX 1410 ати и
SFX 1410 ати имо
SFX 1410 ати ите
SFX 1410 ати е
SFX 1410 ати ао
SFX 1410 ати ала
SFX 1410 ати ало
SFX 1410 ати али
SFX 1410 ати але
SFX 1410 ати аћу
SFX 1410 ати аћеш
SFX 1410 ати аће
SFX 1410 ати аћемо
SFX 1410 ати аћете
SFX 1410 ати аће
SFX 1410 ати и
SFX 1410 ати имо
SFX 1410 ати ите
SFX 1410 ати ах
SFX 1410 ати аше
SFX 1410 ати асмо
SFX 1410 ати асте
SFX 1410 ати аху
SFX 1410 ати ићи

SFX 1411 Y 27
SFX 1411 ети ети
SFX 1411 ети им
SFX 1411 ети иш
SFX 1411 ети и
SFX 1411 ети имо
SFX 1411 ети ите
SFX 1411 ети е
SFX 1411 ети ео
SFX 1411 ети ела
SFX 1411 ети ело
SFX 1411 ети ели
SFX 1411 ети еле
SFX 1411 ети ећу
SFX 1411 ети ећеш
SFX 1411 ети еће
SFX 1411 ети ећемо
SFX 1411 ети ећете
SFX 1411 ети еће
SFX 1411 ети и
SFX 1411 ети имо
SFX 1411 ети ите
SFX 1411 ети ех
SFX 1411 ети еше
SFX 1411 ети есмо
SFX 1411 ети есте
SFX 1411 ети аху
SFX 1411 ети ећи

SFX 1412 Y 27
SFX 1412 тјети тјети
SFX 1412 тјети тим
SFX 1412 тјети тиш
SFX 1412 тјети ти
SFX 1412 тјети тимо
SFX 1412 тјети тите
SFX 1412 тјети те
SFX 1412 тјети тио
SFX 1412 тјети тјела
SFX 1412 тјети тјело
SFX 1412 тјети тјели
SFX 1412 тјети тјеле
SFX 1412 тјети тјећу
SFX 1412 тјети тјећеш
SFX 1412 тјети тјеће
SFX 1412 тјети тјећемо
SFX 1412 тјети тјећете
SFX 1412 тјети тјеће
SFX 1412 тјети ти
SFX 1412 тјети тимо
SFX 1412 тјети тите
SFX 1412 тјети тјех
SFX 1412 тјети тјеше
SFX 1412 тјети тјесмо
SFX 1412 тјети тјесте
SFX 1412 тјети ћаху
SFX 1412 тјети тјећи

SFX 1413 Y 38
SFX 1413 гати гати
SFX 1413 гати гам
SFX 1413 гати гаш
SFX 1413 гати га
SFX 1413 гати гамо
SFX 1413 гати гате
SFX 1413 гати гају
SFX 1413 гати жем
SFX 1413 гати жеш
SFX 1413 гати же
SFX 1413 гати жемо
SFX 1413 гати жете
SFX 1413 гати жу
SFX 1413 гати гао
SFX 1413 гати гала
SFX 1413 гати гало
SFX 1413 гати гали
SFX 1413 гати гале
SFX 1413 гати гаћу
SFX 1413 гати гаћеш
SFX 1413 гати гаће
SFX 1413 гати гаћемо
SFX 1413 гати гаћете
SFX 1413 гати гаће
SFX 1413 гати гај
SFX 1413 гати гајмо
SFX 1413 гати гајте
SFX 1413 гати жи
SFX 1413 гати жимо
SFX 1413 гати жите
SFX 1413 гати гах
SFX 1413 гати гаше
SFX 1413 гати гасмо
SFX 1413 гати гасте
SFX 1413 гати жаху
SFX 1413 гати гаху
SFX 1413 гати гајући
SFX 1413 гати жући

SFX 1414 Y 36
SFX 1414 ити ити
SFX 1414 ити им
SFX 1414 ити иш
SFX 1414 ити и
SFX 1414 ити имо
SFX 1414 ити ите
SFX 1414 ити е
SFX 1414 ити ијем
SFX 1414 ити ијеш
SFX 1414 ити ије
SFX 1414 ити ијемо
SFX 1414 ити ијете
SFX 1414 ити ију
SFX 1414 ити ио
SFX 1414 ити ила
SFX 1414 ити ило
SFX 1414 ити или
SFX 1414 ити иле
SFX 1414 ити ићу
SFX 1414 ити ићеш
SFX 1414 ити иће
SFX 1414 ити ићемо
SFX 1414 ити ићете
SFX 1414 ити иће
SFX 1414 ити и
SFX 1414 ити имо
SFX 1414 ити ите
SFX 1414 ити иј
SFX 1414 ити ијмо
SFX 1414 ити ијте
SFX 1414 ити их
SFX 1414 ити ише
SFX 1414 ити исмо
SFX 1414 ити исте
SFX 1414 ити љаху
SFX 1414 ити ећи

SFX 1415 Y 33
SFX 1415 нути нути
SFX 1415 нути нем
SFX 1415 нути неш
SFX 1415 нути не
SFX 1415 нути немо
SFX 1415 нути нете
SFX 1415 нути ну
SFX 1415 нути нуо
SFX 1415 нути нула
SFX 1415 нути нуло
SFX 1415 нути нули
SFX 1415 нути нуле
SFX 1415 нути ао
SFX 1415 нути ла
SFX 1415 нути ло
SFX 1415 нути ли
SFX 1415 нути ле
SFX 1415 нути нућу
SFX 1415 нути нућеш
SFX 1415 нути нуће
SFX 1415 нути нућемо
SFX 1415 нути нућете
SFX 1415 нути нуће
SFX 1415 нути ни
SFX 1415 нути нимо
SFX 1415 нути ните
SFX 1415 нути нух
SFX 1415 нути ну
SFX 1415 нути нуше
SFX 1415 нути нусмо
SFX 1415 нути нусте
SFX 1415 нути нијаху
SFX 1415 нути нувши

SFX 1416 Y 29
SFX 1416 зати зати
SFX 1416 зати жем
SFX 1416 зати жеш
SFX 1416 зати же
SFX 1416 зати жемо
SFX 1416 зати жете
SFX 1416 зати жу
SFX 1416 зати зао
SFX 1416 зати зала
SFX 1416 зати зало
SFX 1416 зати зали
SFX 1416 зати зале
SFX 1416 зати заћу
SFX 1416 зати заћеш
SFX 1416 зати заће
SFX 1416 зати заћемо
SFX 1416 зати заћете
SFX 1416 зати заће
SFX 1416 зати жи
SFX 1416 зати жимо
SFX 1416 зати жите
SFX 1416 зати зах
SFX 1416 зати за
SFX 1416 зати заше
SFX 1416 зати засмо
SFX 1416 зати засте
SFX 1416 зати заху
SFX 1416 зати жући
SFX 1416 зати завши

SFX 1417 Y 29
SFX 1417 лети лети
SFX 1417 лети лим
SFX 1417 лети лиш
SFX 1417 лети ли
SFX 1417 лети лимо
SFX 1417 лети лите
SFX 1417 лети ле
SFX 1417 лети лео
SFX 1417 лети лела
SFX 1417 лети лело
SFX 1417 лети лели
SFX 1417 лети леле
SFX 1417 лети лећу
SFX 1417 лети лећеш
SFX 1417 лети леће
SFX 1417 лети лећемо
SFX 1417 лети лећете
SFX 1417 лети леће
SFX 1417 лети ли
SFX 1417 лети лимо
SFX 1417 лети лите
SFX 1417 лети лех
SFX 1417 лети ле
SFX 1417 лети леше
SFX 1417 лети лесмо
SFX 1417 лети лесте
SFX 1417 лети љаху
SFX 1417 лети лећи
SFX 1417 лети левши

SFX 1418 Y 27
SFX 1418 ати ати
SFX 1418 ати ем
SFX 1418 ати еш
SFX 1418 ати е
SFX 1418 ати емо
SFX 1418 ати ете
SFX 1418 ати у
SFX 1418 ати ао
SFX 1418 ати ала
SFX 1418 ати ало
SFX 1418 ати али
SFX 1418 ати але
SFX 1418 ати аћу
SFX 1418 ати аћеш
SFX 1418 ати аће
SFX 1418 ати аћемо
SFX 1418 ати аћете
SFX 1418 ати аће
SFX 1418 ати и
SFX 1418 ати имо
SFX 1418 ати ите
SFX 1418 ати ах
SFX 1418 ати аше
SFX 1418 ати асмо
SFX 1418 ати асте
SFX 1418 ати аху
SFX 1418 ати ући

SFX 1419 Y 28
SFX 1419 сти сти
SFX 1419 сти зем
SFX 1419 сти зеш
SFX 1419 сти зе
SFX 1419 сти земо
SFX 1419 сти зете
SFX 1419 сти зу
SFX 1419 сти зао
SFX 1419 сти зла
SFX 1419 сти зло
SFX 1419 сти зли
SFX 1419 сти зле
SFX 1419 сти шћу
SFX 1419 сти шћеш
SFX 1419 сти шће
SFX 1419 сти шћемо
SFX 1419 сти шћете
SFX 1419 сти шће
SFX 1419 сти зи
SFX 1419 сти зимо
SFX 1419 сти зите
SFX 1419 сти зох
SFX 1419 сти зо
SFX 1419 сти зоше
SFX 1419 сти зосмо
SFX 1419 сти зосте
SFX 1419 сти зоху
SFX 1419 сти зући

SFX 1420 Y 29
SFX 1420 дети дети
SFX 1420 дети дим
SFX 1420 дети диш
SFX 1420 дети ди
SFX 1420 дети димо
SFX 1420 дети дите
SFX 1420 дети де
SFX 1420 дети део
SFX 1420 дети дела
SFX 1420 дети дело
SFX 1420 дети дели
SFX 1420 дети деле
SFX 1420 дети дећу
SFX 1420 дети дећеш
SFX 1420 дети деће
SFX 1420 дети дећемо
SFX 1420 дети дећете
SFX 1420 дети деће
SFX 1420 дети ди
SFX 1420 дети димо
SFX 1420 дети дите
SFX 1420 дети дех
SFX 1420 дети де
SFX 1420 дети деше
SFX 1420 дети десмо
SFX 1420 дети десте
SFX 1420 дети ђаху
SFX 1420 дети дећи
SFX 1420 дети девши

SFX 1421 Y 29
SFX 1421 јети јети
SFX 1421 јети им
SFX 1421 јети иш
SFX 1421 јети и
SFX 1421 јети имо
SFX 1421 јети ите
SFX 1421 јети е
SFX 1421 јети ио
SFX 1421 јети јела
SFX 1421 јети јело
SFX 1421 јети јели
SFX 1421 јети јеле
SFX 1421 јети јећу
SFX 1421 јети јећеш
SFX 1421 јети јеће
SFX 1421 јети јећемо
SFX 1421 јети јећете
SFX 1421 јети јеће
SFX 1421 јети и
SFX 1421 јети имо
SFX 1421 јети ите
SFX 1421 јети јех
SFX 1421 јети је
SFX 1421 јети јеше
SFX 1421 јети јесмо
SFX 1421 јети јесте
SFX 1421 јети ењаху
SFX 1421 јети јећи
SFX 1421 јети јевши

SFX 1422 Y 38
SFX 1422 јати јати
SFX 1422 јати јам
SFX 1422 јати јаш
SFX 1422 јати ја
SFX 1422 јати јамо
SFX 1422 јати јате
SFX 1422 јати јају
SFX 1422 јати јати
SFX 1422 јати јем
SFX 1422 јати јеш
SFX 1422 јати је
SFX 1422 јати јемо
SFX 1422 јати јете
SFX 1422 јати ју
SFX 1422 јати јао
SFX 1422 јати јала
SFX 1422 јати јало
SFX 1422 јати јали
SFX 1422 јати јале
SFX 1422 јати јаћу
SFX 1422 јати јаћеш
SFX 1422 јати јаће
SFX 1422 јати јаћемо
SFX 1422 јати јаћете
SFX 1422 јати јаће
SFX 1422 јати јај
SFX 1422 јати јајмо
SFX 1422 јати јајте
SFX 1422 јати ј
SFX 1422 јати јмо
SFX 1422 јати јте
SFX 1422 јати јах
SFX 1422 јати јаше
SFX 1422 јати јасмо
SFX 1422 јати јасте
SFX 1422 јати јаху
SFX 1422 јати јајући
SFX 1422 јати јући

SFX 1423 Y 27
SFX 1423 ти ти
SFX 1423 ти јем
SFX 1423 ти јеш
SFX 1423 ти је
SFX 1423 ти јемо
SFX 1423 ти јете
SFX 1423 ти ју
SFX 1423 ти о
SFX 1423 ти ла
SFX 1423 ти ло
SFX 1423 ти ли
SFX 1423 ти ле
SFX 1423 ти ћу
SFX 1423 ти ћеш
SFX 1423 ти ће
SFX 1423 ти ћемо
SFX 1423 ти ћете
SFX 1423 ти ће
SFX 1423 ти ј
SFX 1423 ти јмо
SFX 1423 ти јте
SFX 1423 ти х
SFX 1423 ти ше
SFX 1423 ти смо
SFX 1423 ти сте
SFX 1423 ти јаху
SFX 1423 ти јући

SFX 1424 Y 27
SFX 1424 нети нети
SFX 1424 нети ним
SFX 1424 нети ниш
SFX 1424 нети ни
SFX 1424 нети нимо
SFX 1424 нети ните
SFX 1424 нети не
SFX 1424 нети нео
SFX 1424 нети нела
SFX 1424 нети нело
SFX 1424 нети нели
SFX 1424 нети неле
SFX 1424 нети нећу
SFX 1424 нети нећеш
SFX 1424 нети неће
SFX 1424 нети нећемо
SFX 1424 нети нећете
SFX 1424 нети неће
SFX 1424 нети ни
SFX 1424 нети нимо
SFX 1424 нети ните
SFX 1424 нети нех
SFX 1424 нети неше
SFX 1424 нети несмо
SFX 1424 нети несте
SFX 1424 нети њаху
SFX 1424 нети нећи

SFX 1425 Y 27
SFX 1425 њети њети
SFX 1425 њети ним
SFX 1425 њети ниш
SFX 1425 њети ни
SFX 1425 њети нимо
SFX 1425 њети ните
SFX 1425 њети ни
SFX 1425 њети ио
SFX 1425 њети њела
SFX 1425 њети њело
SFX 1425 њети њели
SFX 1425 њети њеле
SFX 1425 њети њећу
SFX 1425 њети њећеш
SFX 1425 њети њеће
SFX 1425 њети њећемо
SFX 1425 њети њећете
SFX 1425 њети њеће
SFX 1425 њети ни
SFX 1425 њети нимо
SFX 1425 њети ните
SFX 1425 њети њех
SFX 1425 њети њеше
SFX 1425 њети њесмо
SFX 1425 њети њесте
SFX 1425 њети њаху
SFX 1425 њети њећи

SFX 1426 Y 27
SFX 1426 зати зати
SFX 1426 зати жем
SFX 1426 зати жеш
SFX 1426 зати же
SFX 1426 зати жемо
SFX 1426 зати жете
SFX 1426 зати жу
SFX 1426 зати зао
SFX 1426 зати зала
SFX 1426 зати зало
SFX 1426 зати зали
SFX 1426 зати зале
SFX 1426 зати заћу
SFX 1426 зати заћеш
SFX 1426 зати заће
SFX 1426 зати заћемо
SFX 1426 зати заћете
SFX 1426 зати заће
SFX 1426 зати жи
SFX 1426 зати жимо
SFX 1426 зати жите
SFX 1426 зати зах
SFX 1426 зати заше
SFX 1426 зати засмо
SFX 1426 зати засте
SFX 1426 зати заху
SFX 1426 зати жући

SFX 1427 Y 27
SFX 1427 зити зити
SFX 1427 зити зим
SFX 1427 зити зиш
SFX 1427 зити зи
SFX 1427 зити зимо
SFX 1427 зити зите
SFX 1427 зити зе
SFX 1427 зити зио
SFX 1427 зити зила
SFX 1427 зити зило
SFX 1427 зити зили
SFX 1427 зити зиле
SFX 1427 зити зићу
SFX 1427 зити зићеш
SFX 1427 зити зиће
SFX 1427 зити зићемо
SFX 1427 зити зићете
SFX 1427 зити зиће
SFX 1427 зити зи
SFX 1427 зити зимо
SFX 1427 зити зите
SFX 1427 зити зих
SFX 1427 зити зише
SFX 1427 зити зисмо
SFX 1427 зити зисте
SFX 1427 зити жаху
SFX 1427 зити зећи

SFX 1428 Y 28
SFX 1428 ати ати
SFX 1428 ати ам
SFX 1428 ати аш
SFX 1428 ати а
SFX 1428 ати амо
SFX 1428 ати ате
SFX 1428 ати ају
SFX 1428 ати ао
SFX 1428 ати ала
SFX 1428 ати ало
SFX 1428 ати али
SFX 1428 ати але
SFX 1428 ати аћу
SFX 1428 ати аћеш
SFX 1428 ати аће
SFX 1428 ати аћемо
SFX 1428 ати аћете
SFX 1428 ати аће
SFX 1428 ати ај
SFX 1428 ати ајмо
SFX 1428 ати ајте
SFX 1428 ати ах
SFX 1428 ати аше
SFX 1428 ати асмо
SFX 1428 ати асте
SFX 1428 ати аху
SFX 1428 ати ајући
SFX 1428 ати авши

SFX 1429 Y 34
SFX 1429 ати ати
SFX 1429 ати анем
SFX 1429 ати анеш
SFX 1429 ати ане
SFX 1429 ати анемо
SFX 1429 ати анете
SFX 1429 ати ану
SFX 1429 ати ао
SFX 1429 ати ала
SFX 1429 ати ало
SFX 1429 ати али
SFX 1429 ати але
SFX 1429 ати аћу
SFX 1429 ати аћеш
SFX 1429 ати аће
SFX 1429 ати аћемо
SFX 1429 ати аћете
SFX 1429 ати аће
SFX 1429 ати ани
SFX 1429 ати анимо
SFX 1429 ати аните
SFX 1429 ати ах
SFX 1429 ати а
SFX 1429 ати аше
SFX 1429 ати асмо
SFX 1429 ати асте
SFX 1429 ати аху
SFX 1429 ати адох
SFX 1429 ати аде
SFX 1429 ати адоше
SFX 1429 ати адосмо
SFX 1429 ати адосте
SFX 1429 ати адоху
SFX 1429 ати авши

SFX 1430 Y 28
SFX 1430 тити тити
SFX 1430 тити тим
SFX 1430 тити тиш
SFX 1430 тити ти
SFX 1430 тити тимо
SFX 1430 тити тите
SFX 1430 тити те
SFX 1430 тити тио
SFX 1430 тити тила
SFX 1430 тити тило
SFX 1430 тити тили
SFX 1430 тити тиле
SFX 1430 тити тићу
SFX 1430 тити тићеш
SFX 1430 тити тиће
SFX 1430 тити тићемо
SFX 1430 тити тићете
SFX 1430 тити тиће
SFX 1430 тити ти
SFX 1430 тити тимо
SFX 1430 тити тите
SFX 1430 тити тих
SFX 1430 тити ти
SFX 1430 тити тише
SFX 1430 тити тисмо
SFX 1430 тити тисте
SFX 1430 тити ћаху
SFX 1430 тити тивши
